test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tidaar_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tidār: # Noun 233 'eng /est tütar/fin' - full paradigm
     tidār+N+Sg+Nom: tidār
     tidār+N+Sg+Gen: tidār
     tidār+N+Sg+Par: tidārt
     tidār+N+Sg+Dat: tidārõn
     tidār+N+Sg+Ins: tidārõks
     tidār+N+Sg+Ill: tidārõ
     tidār+N+Sg+Ela: tidārõst
     tidār+N+Pl+Nom: tidārd
     tidār+N+Pl+Gen: tidārd
     tidār+N+Pl+Par: tidāŗi
     tidār+N+Pl+Dat: tidārdõn
     tidār+N+Pl+Ins: tidārdõks
     tidār+N+Pl+Ill: tidāŗiž
     tidār+N+Pl+Ela: tidāŗist
